Illinois, session 104th, HB1079.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Collective Bargaining Freedom Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 12/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Collective Bargaining Freedom Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-3, eff. 4-12-19.)